Utah statutes.
63G-6a-2104.   Compliance by one procurement unit pursuant to agreement considered compliance by others to agreement.

(1)  When a procurement unit that administers a cooperative procurement complies with the requirements of this chapter, any procurement unit participating in the purchase is considered to have complied with this chapter.

(2)  A procurement unit may not enter into a cooperative procurement agreement for the purpose of circumventing this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

